es: Tipo de enchufe: Ethernet; Multimedia; Enchufe; Satélite; Afeitadora; TV; Teléfono; USB; Otros
nb: Sokkeltype: Ethernet; Multimedia; Støpsel; Satellitt; Barbermaskin; TV; Telefon; USB; Annet
zh-TW: 插座類型: 乙太網路; 多媒體; 插頭; 衛星; 刮鬍刀; 電視; 電話; USB; 其他
th: ประเภทซ็อกเก็ต: อีเทอร์เน็ต; มัลติมีเดีย; ปลั๊ก; ระบบจานดาวเทียม; เครื่องโกนหนวด; ทีวี; โทรศัพท์; USB; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de prise: Ethernet; Multimédia; Prise; Satellite; Rasoir; TV; Téléphone; USB; Autre
ro-RO: Tip mufă: Ethernet; Multimedia; Ștecher; Satelit; Shaver; TV; Telefon; USB; Altele
it: Tipo di presa: Ethernet; Multimedia; Presa; Satellitare; Rasoio; TV; Telefono; USB; Altro
pl: Typ gniazda: Ethernet; Multimedia; Wtyczka; Satelita; Golarka; TV; Telefon; USB; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de soquete: Ethernet; Multimídia; Plugue; Satélite; Barbeador; TV; Telefone; USB; Outro
zh-CN: 插座类型: 以太网; 多媒体; 插头; 卫星; 剃须刀; TV; 电话; USB; 其他
fi: Pistorasiatyyppi: Ethernet; Monimedia; Pistoke; Satelliitti; Parranajokone; TV; Puhelin; USB; Muu
lt-LT: Prievado tipas: Eternetas; Multimedija; Kištukas; Palydovinė; Skustuvas; TV; Telefonas; USB; Kita
nl: Type socket: Ethernet; Multimedia; Plug; Satelliet; Scheerapparaat; TV; Telefoon; USB; Andere
vi: Loại ổ cắm: Ethernet; Đa phương tiện; Phích cắm; Vệ tinh; Dao cạo; TV; Điện thoại; USB; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de tomada: Ethernet; Multimédia; Ficha; Satélite; Máquina de barbear; TV; Telefone; USB; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta utičnice: Ethernet; Multimedija; Utikač; Satelit; Aparat za brijanje; TV; Telefon; USB; Ostalo
ru: Тип розетки: Ethernet; Мультимедиа; Розетка; Спутниковый; Бритва; TV; Телефон; USB; Другой
hu: Aljzat típusa: Ethernet; Multimédia; Dugó; Műhold; Borotva; TV; Telefon; USB; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип гнездо: Ethernet; Мултимедия; Щепсел; Сателит; Самобръсначка; TV; Телефон; USB; Други
ja: コンセントの種類: イーサネット; マルチメディア; プラグ; サテライト; シェーバー; TV; 電話; USB; その他
ko: 소켓 유형: 이더넷; 멀티미디어; 플러그; 위성; 면도기; TV; 전화; USB; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta vtičnice: Ethernet; Multimedija; Vtikač; Satelitska; Brivnik; TV; Telefon; USB; Drugo
da: Sokkeltype: Ethernet; Multimedier; Prop; Satellit; Barbermaskine; TV; Telefon; USB; Andet
de: Sockeltyp: Ethernet; Multimedia; Stecker; Satellit; Rasierapparat; TV; Telefon; USB; Sonstiges
cs: Typ zásuvky: Ethernet; Multimédia; Zástrčka; Satelit; Holicí strojek; TV; Telefon; USB; Jiné
en: Socket type: Ethernet; Multimedia; Plug; Satellite; Shaver; TV; Telephone; USB; Other
sv: Uttagstyp: Ethernet; Multimedia; Plugg; Satellit; Rakapparat; TV; Telefon; USB; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ zásuvky: Ethernet; Multimédiá; Zástrčka; Satelit; Holiaci strojček; TV; Telefón; USB; Iné
tr: Soket türü: Ethernet; Multimedya; Fiş; Uydu; Tıraş makinesi; TV; Telefon; USB; Diğer
el: Τύπος πρίζας: Ethernet; Πολυμέσα; Βύσμα; Δορυφορική; Ξυριστική μηχανή; TV; Τηλέφωνο; USB; Άλλο